New York, session 2025-2026, S4604.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The financial services law is amended by adding a new 2 section 813 to read as follows: 3 § 813. Application. The requirements of this article shall not impose 4 any liability on a provider as a result of the actual annual percentage 5 rate charged by the provider differing from the estimated annual 6 percentage rate disclosed by the provider acting in good faith and in 7 conformity with this article and applicable department rules and regu- 8 lations. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08928-01-5